Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201821-2,182
Court costs and expenses.

(MBCA 13.31) (a) The court
in an appraisal proceeding commenced under section 21-2,181 shall determine
all court costs of the proceeding, including the reasonable compensation and
expenses of appraisers appointed by the court. The court shall assess the
court costs against the corporation, except that the court may assess court
costs against all or some of the shareholders demanding appraisal, in amounts
which the court finds equitable, to the extent the court finds such shareholders
acted arbitrarily, vexatiously, or not in good faith with respect to the rights
provided by sections 21-2,171 to 21-2,183.

(b) The court in an appraisal
proceeding may also assess the expenses of the respective parties in amounts
the court finds equitable:

(1)
Against the corporation and in favor of any or all shareholders demanding
appraisal if the court finds the corporation did not substantially comply
with the requirements of section 21-2,174, 21-2,176, 21-2,178, or 21-2,179;
or

(2)
Against either the corporation or a shareholder demanding appraisal, in favor
of any other party, if the court finds the party against whom expenses are
assessed acted arbitrarily, vexatiously, or not in good faith with respect
to the rights provided by sections 21-2,171 to 21-2,183.

(c) If the court in an appraisal
proceeding finds that the expenses incurred by any shareholder were of substantial
benefit to other shareholders similarly situated and that such expenses should
not be assessed against the corporation, the court may direct that such expenses
be paid out of the amounts awarded the shareholders who were benefited.

(d) To the extent the corporation
fails to make a required payment pursuant to section 21-2,178, 21-2,179, or
21-2,180, the shareholder may sue directly for the amount owed and, to the
extent successful, shall be entitled to recover from the corporation all expenses
of the suit.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 182.